Alabama, session 2026rs, SB9.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 22-15A-1 and 22-15A-3 of the Code
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§22-15A-1
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
"Alabama Vivian Davis Figures and Barbara Drummond Clean
Indoor Air Act.""
"§22-15A-3
As used in this chapter, the following words and
phrases shall have the following meanings:
(1) BAR AND LOUNGE. Any establishment which is
primarily devoted to the serving of alcoholic beverages for
consumption by patrons on the premises and in which the
serving of food is only incidental to the consumption of
beverages. Although a restaurant may contain a bar, the term
"bar" shall not include the restaurant dining area.
(2) CHILD CARE FACILITY. Any facility caring for
children.
(3) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Public
Page 1

(3) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Public
SB9 Enrolled
Health.
(4) EMPLOYER. Any person, partnership, association,
corporation, or nonprofit entity that employs five or more
persons, including the legislative, executive, and judicial
branches of state government; and any county, city, town, or
village, or any other political subdivision of the state; any
public authority, commission, agency, or public benefit
corporation; or any other separate corporate instrumentality
or unit of state or local government.
(5) GOVERNMENT BUILDING. Any building owned or operated
by the state, including the legislative, executive, and
judicial branches of state government; any county, city, town,
or village, or any other political subdivision of the state;
any public authority, commission, agency, or public benefit
corporation; or any other separate corporate instrumentality
or unit of state or local government.
(6) PUBLIC CONVEYANCE. A bus, taxi, train, trolley,
boat, and any other means of public transit.
(7) PUBLIC MEETING. Any meeting open to the public
unless held in a private residence.
(8) PUBLIC PLACE. Any enclosed area to which the public
is permitted, including, but not limited to, auditoriums,
elevators, hospitals, nursing homes, libraries, courtrooms,
jury waiting rooms and deliberation rooms, theatres theaters,
museums, common areas of retirement homes, restaurants,
laundromats, health facilities, educational facilities,
shopping malls, government buildings, sports and recreational
facilities, places of employment, airports, banks, retail
Page 2

facilities, places of employment, airports, banks, retail
SB9 Enrolled
stores, and service establishments. A private residence is not
a "public place."
(9) SERVICE LINE. Any indoor line at which one or more
persons are waiting for or receiving service of any kind,
whether or not the service involves the exchange of money.
(10) SMOKING. The burning of a lighted cigarette,
cigar, pipe, or any other matter or substance that contains
tobacco, and the use of an electronic nicotine delivery system
as defined in Section 28-11-2.
(11) SMOKING AREA. Any designated area meeting the
requirements of Section 22-15A-7."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
SB9 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB9
Senate 29-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Amended and passed: 09-Apr-26


100
101
102 Senate concurred in House amendment 09-Apr-26
103
104
105
106
107 By: Senator Allen
Page 4